District of Columbia statutes.
6-225

Intragovernmental cooperation.

To the extent practicable and as pertaining to the economic enhancement of the District of Columbia, the Authority shall work cooperatively with the development of annual workplans and budgets for the following:

(1)

Office of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development;

(2)

Department of Housing and Community Development;

(3)

Department of General Services;

(4)

National Capital Revitalization Corporation;

(5)

Community Development Corporations; and

(6)

Business Improvement Districts.

History

May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-105, § 26, 47 DCR 1325
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 47, 59 DCR 6190

Section References

This section is referenced in § 4-756.01.

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 substituted “Department of General Services” for “Office of Property Management” in (3).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 25 of the District of Columbia Housing Authority Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-259, February 9, 2000, 47 DCR 1129).
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 25 of the District of Columbia Housing Authority Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-346, June 5, 2000, 47 DCR 4980).